South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S169.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 59-150-70(D)(2) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (D)(2) sale price of lottery game tickets or shares and the manner of sale except that all sales must be for cash only. Payment by checks, credit cards, charge cards, or other form of deferred payment and payment by debit card are prohibited; SECTION 2.  Chapter 150, Title 59 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 59-150-210(G). All lottery sales must be made in person at licensed lottery retailers or locations approved by the Lottery Commission. Lottery courier services are prohibited. SECTION 3.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----